apertium-lat.lat.dix
    <pardef n="man/ere__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ebo</l>       <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="act"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ebimus</l>    <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="act"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ebis</l>      <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="act"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ebitis</l>    <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="act"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ebit</l>      <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="act"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ebunt</l>     <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="act"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ebor</l>      <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ebimur</l>    <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eberis</l>    <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ebimini</l>   <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ebitur</l>    <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ebuntur</l>   <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ebam</l>      <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="act"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ebamus</l>    <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="act"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ebas</l>      <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="act"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ebatis</l>    <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="act"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ebat</l>      <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="act"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ebant</l>     <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="act"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ebar</l>      <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ebamur</l>    <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ebaris</l>    <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ebamini</l>   <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ebatur</l>    <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ebantur</l>   <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eo</l>         <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="act"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>emus</l>      <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="act"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l>        <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="act"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>etis</l>      <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="act"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>et</l>        <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="act"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ent</l>       <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="act"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eor</l>        <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>emur</l>      <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eris</l>      <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>emini</l>     <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>etur</l>      <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>entur</l>     <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ere</l>       <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="loqu/i__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ar</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="act"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>emur</l>    <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="act"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eris</l>    <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="act"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>emini</l>   <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="act"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>etur</l>    <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="act"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>entur</l>   <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="act"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ebar</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="act"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ebamur</l>    <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="act"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ebaris</l>    <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="act"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ebamini</l>   <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="act"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ebatur</l>    <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="act"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ebantur</l>   <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="act"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>or</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="act"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>imur</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="act"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eris</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="act"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>imini</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="act"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>itur</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="act"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>untur</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="act"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="videre"><i>vid</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "absorbeo" ><i>b</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "aceo" ><i>ac</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "adhibeo" ><i>adhib</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "adipiscor" ><i>adipisc</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "admoneo" ><i>admon</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "adsentior" ><i>adsentir</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "adurgeo" ><i>urg</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "amoveo" ><i>placeholder</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "apiscor" ><i>apisc</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "areo" ><i>placeholder</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "aveo" ><i>av</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "blandior" ><i>blandir</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "cieo" ><i>placeholder</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "circumplector" ><i>circumplect</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "colloquor" ><i>colloqu</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "commorior" ><i>commor</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "compareo" ><i>par</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "complector" ><i>complect</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "confiteor" ><i>confiter</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "conqueror" ><i>quer</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "conterreo" ><i>placeholder</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "coorior" ><i>ir</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "degredior" ><i>gred</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "demoveo" ><i>mov</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "depascor" ><i>pasc</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "deterreo" ><i>deterr</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "displiceo" ><i>displic</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "egeo" ><i>eg</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "egredior" ><i>egred</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "emergo" ><i>ger</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "enitor" ><i>enit</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "exorior" ><i>exorir</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "experior" ><i>experir</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "expleo" ><i>expl</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "enascor" ><i>enasc</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "fido" ><i>fider</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "fleo" ><i>fl</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "fruor" ><i>fru</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "gaudeo" ><i>gauder</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "hebeo" ><i>placeholder</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "illabor" ><i>lab</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "indigeo" ><i>dig</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "innascor" ><i>nasc</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "insequor" ><i>insequ</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "interiaceo" ><i>iac</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "intueor" ><i>intuer</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "lateo" ><i>lat</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "madeo" ><i>placeholder</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "mereor" ><i>merer</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "mordeo" ><i>mord</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "nascor" ><i>nasc</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "obsequor" ><i>obsequ</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "obsideo" ><i>obsid</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "palleo" ><i>placeholder</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "partior" ><i>partir</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "permaneo" ><i>perman</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "perpetior" ><i>pet</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "pertimeo" ><i>tim</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "praefulgeo" ><i>placeholder</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "praetergredior" ><i>gred</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "prandeo" ><i>prand</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "progredior" ><i>progred</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "pudeo" ><i>placeholder</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "reluceo" ><i>placeholder</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "renascor" ><i>renasc</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "resorbeo" ><i>placeholder</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "revereor" ><i>verer</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "rubeo" ><i>rub</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "splendeo" ><i>placeholder</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "subluceo" ><i>luc</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "subterlabor" ><i>lab</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "suscenseo" ><i>suscens</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "terreo" ><i>terr</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "transgredior" ><i>gred</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "umeo" ><i>placeholder</i><par n="man/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "utor" ><i>ut</i><par n="loqu/i__vblex"/></e>
